Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1397.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5112. Use of media devices.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a person may use or operate a media device to capture, record, transmit or broadcast an image, video or audio of a judicial proceeding without the approval of the court or presiding judicial officer.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to:(1) A proceeding relating to sexual abuse.(2) A proceeding relating to domestic violence.(3) A proceeding under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to 123456789101112131415161718 protection from abuse).(4) A proceeding under Chapter 62A (relating to protection of victims of sexual violence or intimidation).(5) The testimony of a child witness.(6) The testimony of a confidential informant.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Confidential informant." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3124.2(b) (relating to institutional sexual assault)."Domestic violence." A personal injury crime perpetrated against a family or household member."Family or household member." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions)."Personal injury crime." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 3103 (relating to definitions)."Sexual abuse." An activity prohibited under any of the following provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses):(1) Chapter 30 (relating to human trafficking), if the activity involved sexual servitude, as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001 (relating to definitions).(2) Chapter 31 (relating to sexual offenses).(3) Section 4302 (relating to incest).(4) Section 4304 (relating to endangering welfare of children), if the activity involved sexual contact with an individual under 18 years of age.(5) Section 5902(b), (b.1), (d) or (e) (relating to prostitution and related offenses).(6) Section 6312 (relating to sexual abuse of children).20250HB1397PN1591 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Section 6320 (relating to sexual exploitation of children).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1397PN1591 - 3 - 123